pl: Sprzęt > Narzędzia > Polerki i froterki: Polerki i froterki orbitalne; Polerki i froterki obrotowe
pt-BR: Ferragens > Ferramentas > Polidores: Polidores de piso orbitais; Polidores de piso rotativos
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nářadí a nástroje > Leštiče a čističe: Orbitální leštičky; Rotační leštičky
tr: Hırdavat > Aletler > Cilalayıcılar ve Perdahlayıcılar: Orbital Parlatıcılar ve Tamponlar; Döner Parlatıcılar ve Tamponlar
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Εργαλεία > Στίλβωτρα & εργαλεία στίλβωσης: Τροχιακά στίλβωτρα & εργαλεία στίλβωσης; Περιστροφικά στίλβωτρα & εργαλεία στίλβωσης
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøy > Pusseredskaper og poleringsskiver: Sirkelformede pusseredskaper og poleringsskiver; Roterende pusseredskaper og poleringsskiver
ro-RO: Feronerie > Unelte > Polizoare și discuri de lustruit: Polizoare orbitale și discuri de lustruit; Polizoare rotative și discuri de lustruit
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具 > 拋光機/緩衝器: 軌道拋光機/緩衝器; 旋轉拋光機/緩衝器
da: Isenkram > Redskaber > Polerværktøjer og polerskiver: Orbitale polermaskiner og buffere; Roterende polermaskiner og buffere
ko: 철물 > 도구 > 광택기/버퍼: 궤도형 광택기/버퍼; 회전형 광택기/버퍼
hu: Hardver > Szerszámok > Polírozók és fényesítők: Orbitális polírozók és fényesítők; Rotációs polírozók és fényesítők
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Инструменты > Полировальные машины: Эксцентриковые полировальные машины; Ротационные полировальные машины
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeuge > Schleifer & Poliermaschinen: Exzenterpoliermaschinen; Poliermaschinen
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankiai > Poliruokliai ir vaškavimo įrankiai: Ekscentriniai poliruokliai ir vaškavimo įrankiai; Rotoriniai poliruokliai ir vaškavimo įrankiai
vi: Phần cứng > Công cụ > Dụng cụ đánh bóng & Giảm chấn: Máy đánh bóng lệch tâm & đệm; Máy đánh đồng tâm & đệm
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Orodja > Polirniki in brusilniki: Polirniki in brusilniki; Rotacijski polirniki in brusilniki
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschap > Poets- en polijstmachines: Boen- en polijstmachines; Roterende boen- en polijstmachines
sk-SK: Náradie > Nástroje > Leštičky a pufre: Kruhové leštičky a pufre; Rotačné leštičky a pufre
en: Hardware > Tools > Polishers & Buffers: Orbital Polishers & Buffers; Rotary Polishers & Buffers
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เครื่องมือ > เครื่องขัดและเครื่องขัดเงา: เครื่องขัดและเครื่องขัดเงาพื้นแบบเบ้า; เครื่องขัดและเครื่องขัดเงาพื้นแบบโรตารี่
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Utensili > Lucidatrici e pulitrici: Lucidatrici e pulitrici orbitali; Lucidatrici e pulitrici rotanti
fr: Quincaillerie > Outils > Polisseuses et lustreuses: Polisseuses et tampons orbitaux; Polisseuses et tampons rotatifs
hr-HR: Željezarija > Alati > Alati za poliranje i laštenje: Orbitalni alati za poliranje i laštenje; Rotacijski alati za poliranje i laštenje
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具 > 磨光机/磨光器: 轨道抛光机和缓冲器; 旋转式抛光机和缓冲器
es: Bricolaje > Herramientas > Pulidoras: Pulidoras orbitales; Pulidoras rotativas
bg-BG: Железария > Инструменти > Машини за полиране: Орбитални полиращи машини; Въртящи се машини за полиране
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalut > Kiillotus- ja hiontalaitteet: Orbitaaliset kiillotuskoneet ja puskimet; Pyörivät kiillotuskoneet ja puskimet
pt-PT: Equipamento > Ferramentas > Polidores e esmeris: Dispositivos de polimento orbitais; Dispositivos de polimento rotativos
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktyg > Poleringsverktyg: Orbitalmaskiner för vaxning och polering; Roterande maskiner för vaxning och polering
ja: DIY用品 > 工具 > ポリッシャー・バッファー: オービタルポリッシャー&バッファー; ロータリーポリッシャー&バッファー